Washington statutes.
RCW 42.36.070

Quasi-judicial proceedings—Prior advisory proceedings.

Participation by a member of a decision-making body in earlier proceedings that result in an advisory recommendation to a decision-making body shall not disqualify that person from participating in any subsequent quasi-judicial proceeding.

[ 1982 c 229 s 7.]